incubator/apertium-cv-tr/apertium-cv-tr.tr.lexc
LEXICON PRON-REF

! FIXME:
! Listing all forms here because of overgeneration with *өздерім,
! *өздеріміз, *өзіңдер etc while linking to POSS-REAL. This was the idea.
! Now they are handled more like personal pronouns (the same tags in the same
! order), so they should pass transfer without any trouble.
!-----
! A remaining problem with reflexive pronoun is that it takes personal copula
! suffixes "selectively": e.g. prn.refl.px1sg would take only cop.px1sg
! (prn.ref.px3sp seems to take all of them though).
! A little bit of overgeneration won't hurt anyone :), but I think that odd
! forms could be filtered out somehow later. Don't know how to do it./04Aug, IS/

! FIXME DISCUSS Write full forms for the lower side and put only PRON-DEF in the
! Root Lexicon


%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}m PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}n PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{pN%} PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}m%{I%}z PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}n%{I%}z PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%>%{I%}%{pN%} PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON-ADV 

%<prn%>%<adv%>: CASE-NONOM ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!	CONJUNCTIONS, CAUSE EVEN SENTENCES AND WORDS WANNA BE TOGETHER !!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CA

%<cnjadv%>: # ;

LEXICON CS 

%<cnjsub%>: # ;

LEXICON CC 

%<cnjcoo%>: # ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Numeral paradigms
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NUM

%<num%>: # ;                                        ! Beş evi görüyorum.
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{i%}nc%{I%} # ;                   ! Beşinci evi görüyorum.
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%>%{i%}nc%{I%} SUBST ;      ! Beşinciyi görüyorum.
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;                           ! Beşi görüyorum.

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Adverb paradigms
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADV1

%<adv%>: # ; ! this is for when the adverb is used as an adverb
%<adv%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<adv%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV2

%<adv%>: # ;
%<adv%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV3

%<adv%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Adjective paradigms
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON A1

%<adj%>: # ; 
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<adj%>%<advl%>: # ;

LEXICON A2

%<adj%>: # ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON A3

%<adj%>: # ;
%<adj%>%<advl%>: # ;

LEXICON A4

%<adj%>: CLIT-NOPERS ; ! FIXME: Check for overgeneration e.g. vardiyim

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Verb paradigms
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


LEXICON V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3-FINAL

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}m  # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n  # ;
!%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  # ;
%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>{D%}%{I%}r  # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}z  # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r  # ;


LEXICON PERS1-NO3PL 

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}m  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>{D%}%{I%}r  CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}z  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  CLIT ;

LEXICON PERS1  !!!USED FOR CONT, FUT, AOR, EVID

%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>%<frm%>:%>l%{A%}r%{D%}%{I%}r   CLIT ;
PERS1-NO3PL ;

LEXICON PERS2  !!!USED FOR PAST and CONDITIONAL

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>n  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>{D%}%{I%}r  CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>k  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{i%}n%{I%}z  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r  CLIT ;

LEXICON PERS2-NO3PL 

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m  # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>n  # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  # ;
%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>{D%}%{I%}r  CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>k  # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{i%}n%{I%}z  # ;

LEXICON PERS3  !!!USED FOR NECESSITATIVE

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}m  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>{D%}%{I%}r  CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}z  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r  CLIT ;

LEXICON PERS3-PAST
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}m # ;                
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}n # ;                
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%} # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}k # ;                
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}n%{I%}z # ;                
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}l%{A%}r # ;  

LEXICON PERS4  !!!USED FOR IMPERATIVE
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>  # ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>:%>y%{I%}n # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{A%}n%{A%}  # ;

LEXICON PERS5  !!!USED FOR negative aorist and abil
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m%{A%}m  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>m%{A%}zs%{I%}n  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>m%{A%}z CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>m%{A%}z%{D%}%{I%}r  CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>m%{A%}y%{I%}z  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>m%{A%}zs%{I%}n%{I%}z  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>m%{A%}zl%{A%}r  CLIT ;

LEXICON PERS6 !!! USED By Exhortative

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}y%{I%}m  CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}l%{I%}m  CLIT ;

LEXICON KEN !!! ADVERBIAL FORM 

%<ken%>:%>ken # ;



LEXICON REC-DIR-AR

%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş CAUS-DIR-AR ;
%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş NECE ;
CAUS-DIR-AR ;
NECE ;

LEXICON REC-T-AR

%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş CAUS-DIR-AR ;
%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş NECE ;
CAUS-T-AR ;
NECE ;

LEXICON REC-T-AR

%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş CAUS-DIR-IR ;
%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş NECE ;
CAUS-T-IR ;
NECE ;

LEXICON REF-DIR-AR
%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n CAUS-DIR-AR ;
%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n NECE ;
CAUS-DIR-AR ;
NECE ;

LEXICON REF-T-AR
%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n CAUS-T-AR ;
%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n NECE ;
CAUS-T-AR ;
NECE ;

LEXICON REF-T-IR
%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n CAUS-T-IR ;
%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n NECE ;
CAUS-T-IR ;
NECE ;


LEXICON IV-REC-DIR-AR

%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş IV-CAUS-DIR-AR ;
%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş NECE ;
IV-CAUS-DIR-AR ;
NECE ;

LEXICON IV-REF-DIR-AR
%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n IV-CAUS-DIR-AR ;
%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n NECE ;
IV-CAUS-DIR-AR ;
NECE ;


LEXICON PASS-DIR-AR

%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} NECE ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} NON-FINITE ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} GERUND ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} ABIL-AR ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} NEG ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} AOR-IR ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} AOR-IR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} FINITE-VERBS-IR ;


CAUS-DIR-AR ;
NECE ;
NON-FINITE ;
GERUND ;
ABIL-AR ;
NEG ;
AOR-AR ;
AOR-AR-CONDITIONAL ;

LEXICON PASS-T-AR

%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} NECE ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} NON-FINITE ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} GERUND ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} ABIL-AR ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} NEG ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} AOR-AR ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} AOR-IR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} FINITE-VERBS-IR ;

CAUS-T-AR ;
NECE ;
NON-FINITE ;
GERUND ;
ABIL-AR ;
NEG ;
AOR-AR ;
AOR-AR-CONDITIONAL ;

LEXICON PASS-T-IR

%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} NECE ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} NON-FINITE ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} GERUND ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} ABIL-IR ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} NEG ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} AOR-IR ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} AOR-IR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} FINITE-VERBS-IR ;

CAUS-T-IR ;
NECE ;
NON-FINITE ;
GERUND ;
ABIL-IR ;
NEG ;
AOR-IR ;
AOR-IR-CONDITIONAL ;


LEXICON REC-DIR-IR

%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş CAUS-DIR-IR ;
%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş NECE ;
CAUS-DIR-IR ;
NECE ;

LEXICON REF-DIR-IR
%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n CAUS-DIR-IR ;
%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n NECE ;
CAUS-DIR-IR ;
NECE ;

LEXICON IV-REC-DIR-IR

%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş IV-CAUS-DIR-IR ;
%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş NECE ;
IV-CAUS-DIR-IR ;
NECE ;

LEXICON IV-REF-DIR-IR
%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n IV-CAUS-DIR-IR ;
%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n NECE ;
IV-CAUS-DIR-IR ;
NECE ;

LEXICON  Conjunctions
ama:ama CC ; ! "but"
ile:İle CC ; ! "and" ! Dir/LR
ile:ile CC ; ! "and"
ya:ya CC ; ! "either/or"
ye:ye CC ; ! "either/or"
veya:veya CC ; ! "either/or"
ne:ne CC ; ! "neither/nor"
da:da CC ; ! ""
da:de CC ; ! "" ! Dir/LR
fakat:fakat CC ; ! ""
ya% da:ya% da CC ; 
ve:ve CC ; 
fakat:fakat CC ; 
hem:hem CC ; 
lakin:lakin CC ; 
veya:veya CC ; 
ya:ya CC ; 
gerek:gerek CC ; 
kah:kah CC ; 
ki:ki CS ; 
diye:diye CS ; 
olarak:olarak CS ; 
gibi:gibi CS ; 
eğer:eğer CS ; 
şayet:şayet CS ; 
nedeniyle:nedeniyle CS ; 
aksine:aksine CA ; 
bari:bari CA ; 
bilakis:bilakis CA ; 
çünkü:çünkü CA ; 
fakat:fakat CA ; 
hele:hele CA ; 
keza:keza CA ; 
mamafih:mamafih CA ; 
mesela:mesela CA ; 
olsun:olsun CA ; 
oysa% ki:oysa% ki CA ; 
sözgelişi:sözgelişi CA ; 
veya:veya CA ; 
yalnız:yalnız CA ; 
zaten:zaten CA ; 
yok% mu:yok% mu CA ; 
yeter% ki:yeter% ki CA ; 
şöyle% ki:şöyle% ki CA ; 
ya% da:ya% da CA ; 
LEXICON Adjectives
uyumlu:uyumlu A2 ; ! "compatible"
yeni:yeni A1 ; ! "new"
eski:eski A1 ; ! "old"
yaklaşık:yaklaşık A2 ; ! "approximate"
tam:tam A4 ; ! 'exact'
bedava:bedava A3 ;  ! "free"
pembe:pembe A2 ;  ! "pink"
objektif:objektif A2 ;  ! "objective"
ciddi:ciddi A3 ;  ! "serious"
kahverengi:kahverengi A2 ;  ! "brown"
cilveli:cilveli A4 ;  ! "flirtatious"
akıllı:akıllı A1 ;  ! "intelligent, smart, clever"
anlamlı:anlamlı A4 ;  ! "meaningful"
kirli:kirli A4 ;  ! "dirty, dirty"
ücretli:ücretli A2 ;  ! "salaried, paid"
samimi:samimi A4 ;  ! "sincere"
sıcak:sıcak A2 ;  ! "hot"
atik:atik A4 ;  ! "quick"
günlük:günlük%{v%} A2 ;  ! "daily"
normal:normal A3 ; ! "normal"
kültürel:kültürel A1 ;  ! "cultural"
kişisel:kişisel A4 ;  ! "personal"
yeşil:yeşil A2 ;  ! "green"
solgun:solgun A4 ;  ! "pale"
hoş:hoş A3 ;  ! "nice, nice"
standart:standart A2 ;  ! "standart"
serbest:serbest A3 ;  ! "free"
bulutlu:bulutlu A4 ;  ! "cloudy"
temiz:temiz A3 ;  ! "clean"
acımasız:acımasız A1 ;  ! "cruel, ruthless"
kaygısız:kaygısız A1 ;  ! "careless"
beceriksiz:beceriksiz A1 ;  ! "awkward, clumsy, clumsy"
anlamsız:anlamsız A1 ;  ! "meaningless, meaningless, meaningless"
sabırsız:sabırsız A1 ;  ! "impatient"
gösterişsiz:gösterişsiz A1 ;  ! "simple"
titiz:titiz A1 ;  ! "rigorous"
kanunsuz:kanunsuz A1 ;  ! "illegal"
hovarda:hovarda A2 ;  ! ""
kapkara:kapkara A3 ;  ! ""
nadide:nadide A4 ;  ! ""
taze:taze A3 ;  ! ""
taptaze:taptaze A3 ;  ! ""
asabi:asabi A3 ;  ! ""
feci:feci A4 ;  ! ""
sıkı:sıkı A1 ;  ! ""
sevgili:sevgili A2 ;  ! ""
sevimli:sevimli A4 ;  ! ""
gizli:gizli A3 ;  ! ""
dişi:dişi A2 ;  ! ""
mutlak:mutlak A3 ;  ! ""
yüksek:yüksek A2 ;  ! ""
psikolojik:psikolojik A4 ;  ! ""
sanık:sanık%{v%} A1 ;  ! ""
ilk:ilk A1 ;  ! ""
liberal:liberal A3 ;  ! ""
ulusal:ulusal A4 ;  ! ""
kahraman:kahraman A2 ;  ! ""
yavan:yavan A4 ;  ! ""
zengin:zengin A1 ;  ! ""
son:son A2 ;  ! ""
üzgün:üzgün A4 ;  ! ""
uzun:uzun A3 ;  ! ""
hazır:hazır A3 ;  ! ""
boş:boş A3 ;  ! ""
basit:basit A4 ;  ! ""
alt:alt A2 ;  ! ""
sert:sert A3 ;  ! ""
ölü:ölü A2 ;  ! ""
kötü:kötü A1 ;  ! ""
temiz:temiz A3 ;  ! ""
mutsuz:mutsuz A4 ;  ! ""
kısa:kısa A1 ; ! "short"
LEXICON Adverbs 
özellikle:özellikle ADV3 ; ! "especially
arasıra:arasıra ADV3 ; ! "sometimes"
aylarca:aylarca ADV3 ; ! "for months"
belki:belki ADV3 ; ! "perhaps"
birlikte:birlikte ADV3 ; ! "together"
büsbütün:büsbütün ADV3 ; ! "altogether"
derhal:derhal ADV3 ; ! "immediately"
ebediyen:ebediyen ADV3 ; ! "forever"
evvel:evvel ADV3 ; ! "before" @@@ possibly postp
geceleri:geceleri ADV3 ; ! "at nights"
genellikle:genellikle ADV3 ; ! "generally"
güya:güya ADV3 ; ! "so to speak"
henüz:henüz ADV3 ; ! "just"
ileri:ileri ADV3 ; ! "forward"
layıkıyla:layıkıyla ADV3 ; ! "correctly"
aşağı:aşağı  ADV2 ; ! "lowly"
bilhassa:bilhassa  ADV2 ; ! "specially"
düpedüz:düpedüz  ADV2 ; ! "palpably"
epey:epey  ADV2 ; ! "reasonably"
geri:geri  ADV2 ; ! "back""inverted"
gitgide:gitgide  ADV2 ; ! "gradually"
gıyaben:gıyaben  ADV2 ; ! "inabsentia"
kısmen:kısmen ADV2 ; ! "partly" "tolerable"
zor:zor ADV2 ; ! "hard"
önce:önce ADV1 ; ! "previously" @@@@ postp
öyle:öyle ADV1 ; ! "thusly"
sanki:sanki ADV3 ; ! "in a manner, nearly"
toptan:toptan ADV3 ; ! "collectively"
tekrar:tekrar ADV3 ; ! "again"
